New York, session 2025-2026, S9599.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph 17 of 2 subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by chap- 3 ter 219 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 (ii) immunizations that have in effect a recommendation from the advi- 5 sory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 6 control and prevention with respect to the individual involved, or that 7 are recommended by the commissioner of health to the superintendent 8 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 9 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 10 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 11 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians and/or other simi- 12 lar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organizations; 13 § 2. Item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph 8 of subsection (l) of 14 section 3221 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the laws 15 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 16 (ii) immunizations that have in effect a recommendation from the advi- 17 sory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 18 control and prevention with respect to the individual involved, or that 19 are recommended by the commissioner of health to the superintendent 20 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 21 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 22 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 23 and Gynecologists, and the American College of Physicians and/or other 24 similar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organiza- 25 tions; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12023-01-6 S. 9599 2 1 § 3. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 3 of subsection (j) of section 4303 2 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 219 of the laws of 2011, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (B) immunizations that have in effect a recommendation from the advi- 5 sory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 6 control and prevention with respect to the individual involved, or that 7 are recommended by the commissioner of health to the superintendent 8 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 9 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 10 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 11 and Gynecologists, and the American College of Physicians and/or other 12 similar nationally or internationally recognized scientific organiza- 13 tions; 14 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.